North Dakota statutes. TITLE 18 Fires
CHAPTER 18-03 Firefighter’s Association

18-03-01.
North Dakota firefighter’s association — How constituted.

The North Dakota firefighter’s association consists of the various organized fire departments and fire protection districts within this state, and each fire department, fire protection district, and firefighter within the state is entitled to membership in the association upon compliance with the constitution and bylaws of the association.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 18-0301; S.L. 1999, ch. 210, § 1; 2001, ch. 210, § 1.

18-03-01.1.
North Dakota firefighter’s association — Duties and authority.

The North Dakota firefighter’s association shall:

Develop and adopt a statewide fire education and training plan;

Coordinate fire service training at all levels; and

Establish procedures to govern the certification process for firefighter training.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 160, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

18-03-02.
Fire schools.

Fire schools must be held annually under the direction of the North Dakota firefighter’s association. The schools must be held at such times and in such places in North Dakota as may be designated by the North Dakota firefighter’s association executive board. Fire schools may be held by teleconference, video, or other alternative media.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 137, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 18-0302; S.L. 1999, ch. 210, § 2; 2001, ch. 210, § 2.

18-03-03.
Association to report to office of management and budget time and place of school and name of treasurer.

The North Dakota firefighter’s association shall submit to the office of management and budget an annual report of all fire schools held in the state. The association also shall furnish to the office of management and budget the name and address of the treasurer of the association.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 65, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 1033; R.C. 1899, § 1033; R.C. 1905, § 1293; C.L. 1913, § 1841; S.L. 1935, ch. 137, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 18-0303; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 15; 1999, ch. 210, § 3; 2001, ch. 210, § 3.

18-03-04.
Association to furnish bond.

The North Dakota firefighter’s association shall file with the director of the office of management and budget a bond in the penal sum of two thousand dollars conditioned for the faithful disposition of the funds appropriated by the legislative assembly for the use of the association in conducting fire schools.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 65, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 1033; R.C. 1899, § 1033; R.C. 1905, § 1293; C.L. 1913, § 1841; S.L. 1935, ch. 137, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 18-0304; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 16; 1999, ch. 210, § 4; 2001, ch. 210, § 4.

18-03-05.
Statement of desired appropriation submitted to office of the budget.

Not later than July first of each year next preceding a regular session of the legislative assembly, the director of the budget shall send to the North Dakota firefighter’s association a suitable blank form to be filled out with an itemized statement of the amount of money necessary to promote the efficiency and growth of the different fire departments and fire protection districts of the association and to conduct the fire schools to be held during the succeeding biennium under the direction of the association. The association shall return the blanks properly filled out as provided in section 54-44.1-04.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 65, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 1033; R.C. 1899, § 1033; R.C. 1905, § 1293; C.L. 1913, § 1841; S.L. 1935, ch. 137, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 18-0305; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 17; 1965, ch. 358, § 17; 1979, ch. 187, § 20; 1999, ch. 210, § 5; 2001, ch. 210, § 5.

18-03-06.
Director of the budget to prepare estimate for firefighter’s association.

The director of the budget shall include with its estimates an estimate of the amounts necessary to be appropriated to promote the efficiency and growth of the different fire departments and fire protection districts of the association and to conduct fire schools.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 137, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 18-0306; S.L. 1965, ch. 358, § 18; 1999, ch. 210, § 6; 2001, ch. 210, § 6.

18-03-07.
Office of management and budget to pay sum appropriated to association treasurer.

Not later than the first day of August of each year, the office of management and budget, by warrants prepared and issued by the office and signed by the state auditor, shall pay to the treasurer of the North Dakota firefighter’s association the sum appropriated by the legislative assembly for that year. The sum, however, may not be paid until the treasurer of the association has filed the bond required in section 18-03-04.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 65, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 1033; R.C. 1899, § 1033; R.C. 1905, § 1293; C.L. 1913, § 1841; S.L. 1935, ch. 137, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 18-0307; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 18; 2001, ch. 210, § 7.

18-03-08.
Report of use of money.

On or before the first day of July of each year, the president, secretary, and treasurer of the North Dakota firefighter’s association shall make to the office of management and budget a full and complete report, duly verified by the secretary, of the disposition of all moneys received. The association shall provide for an audit annually by a certified public accountant or licensed public accountant who shall submit the audit report to the state auditor’s office. When the report is in the form and style prescribed by the state auditor, the state auditor may not conduct an audit of the records of the association.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 65, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 1033; R.C. 1899, § 1033; R.C. 1905, § 1293; C.L. 1913, § 1841; S.L. 1935, ch. 137, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 18-0308; S.L. 1957, ch. 163, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 18-0308; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 19; 1979, ch. 102, § 3; 2001, ch. 210, § 8.

18-03-09.
Volunteer firemen exempt from poll tax — Duty of secretary of department. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 528, § 24.